Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2157YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 372 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 915.47 Sexual assault forensic 1 examination center grant program. 2 1. The terms defined in section 915.46 shall have the same 3 meaning when used in this section. 4 2. A sexual assault forensic examination center grant 5 program is established in the department of justice. The 6 attorney general shall contract with an eligible nonprofit 7 organization to operate and maintain sexual assault forensic 8 examination centers in this state. The contract may be 9 terminated by the attorney general after a hearing upon written 10 notice and for good cause. 11 3. A nonprofit organization must comply with all of the 12 following to be eligible for a contract under this section: 13 a. Be a nonprofit organization incorporated in this state 14 pursuant to chapter 504. 15 b. Employ or otherwise retain services from sexual assault 16 nurse examiners. 17 c. Maintain, or be in the process of establishing, one or 18 more treatment facilities in this state that are primarily 19 dedicated to providing a diverse range of services to sexual 20 assault survivors, including but not limited to medical 21 forensic services. 22 d. Provide services for sexual assault survivors, including 23 providing sexual assault care and related trainings, as the 24 overall primary purpose of the organization. 25 4. The contracting nonprofit organization shall do all of 26 the following: 27 a. Provide services, including medical forensic services, 28 to sexual assault survivors including adults, children, 29 persons with disabilities, rural Iowans, and other underserved 30 populations. 31 b. Provide or facilitate trainings to medical practitioners 32 regarding the provision of medical forensic services to sexual 33 assault survivors. 34 c. Provide or facilitate trainings to law enforcement 35 -1- LSB 2157YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 4 H.F. 372 officers and prosecuting attorneys regarding sexual assault 1 services. 2 d. Provide or facilitate trainings to members of the 3 public regarding sexual assault services and sexual assault 4 prevention. 5 e. Provide a cooperative team approach regarding sexual 6 assault services, deliver holistic accessible services to 7 sexual assault survivors, and establish an approach that 8 emphasizes the best interests of the sexual assault survivor 9 and that provides investigation, assessment, and rehabilitative 10 services. 11 f. Involve or consult with persons from various professional 12 disciplines who have training and expertise in addressing 13 special types of sexual assault as necessary to address serious 14 cases of sexual assault such as those involving intimate 15 partner violence, dating violence, domestic violence, incest, 16 human trafficking, and drug-facilitated sexual assault. These 17 persons may include but are not limited to physicians and other 18 health care professionals, law enforcement, mental health 19 professionals, social workers, child protection workers, 20 attorneys, juvenile court officers, public health workers, 21 educators, and advocates. 22 g. Submit an annual report to the attorney general 23 describing the services and trainings that have been provided. 24 5. The requirements in subsection 4 are not intended 25 to restrict or otherwise limit the contracting nonprofit 26 organization from seeking funding or reimbursement from other 27 sources including but not limited to charging for attendance 28 at trainings. The contract shall provide general funding as 29 reimbursement toward the contracting nonprofit organizationâs 30 overall operating expenditures. 31 6. The contracting nonprofit organization is not a state 32 agency for the purposes of chapter 8A, subchapter IV, or 33 chapter 20 or 669. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -2- LSB 2157YH (2) 91 as/js 2/ 4 H.F. 372 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill establishes a grant program in the department of 3 justice for a nonprofit organization providing sexual assault 4 forensic examination centers. 5 The bill requires that the attorney general contract with 6 an eligible nonprofit organization to operate and maintain 7 sexual assault forensic examination centers in the state. The 8 contract may be terminated by the attorney general after a 9 hearing upon written notice and for good cause. 10 The bill provides that a nonprofit organization must comply 11 with all of the following to be eligible for a contract under 12 this section: be a nonprofit organization incorporated in 13 the state; employ or otherwise retain services from sexual 14 assault nurse examiners; and maintain, or be in the process of 15 establishing, one or more treatment facilities in the state 16 that are primarily dedicated to providing a diverse range of 17 services to sexual assault survivors, including but not limited 18 to medical forensic services; provide services for sexual 19 assault survivors, including providing sexual assault care 20 and related trainings, as the overall primary purpose of the 21 organization. 22 The bill provides that a contracting nonprofit organization 23 shall: provide services, including medical forensic services, 24 to sexual assault survivors including adults, children, 25 persons with disabilities, rural Iowans, and other underserved 26 populations; provide or facilitate trainings to medical 27 practitioners regarding the provision of medical forensic 28 services; provide or facilitate trainings to law enforcement 29 officers and prosecuting attorneys regarding sexual assault 30 services; provide or facilitate trainings to members of the 31 public regarding sexual assault services and sexual assault 32 prevention; provide a cooperative team approach regarding 33 sexual assault services and establish an approach that 34 emphasizes the best interests of the sexual assault survivor; 35 -3- LSB 2157YH (2) 91 as/js 3/ 4 H.F. 372 involve or consult with persons from various professional 1 disciplines who have training and expertise in addressing 2 special types of sexual assault; and submit an annual report to 3 the attorney general describing the services and trainings that 4 have been provided. 5 The bill provides that a contracting nonprofit organization 6 may seek funding or reimbursement from other sources including 7 but not limited to charging for attendance at trainings. The 8 contract shall provide general funding as reimbursement toward 9 the contracting nonprofit organizationâs overall operating 10 expenditures. 11 The bill provides that a contracting nonprofit organization 12 is not a state agency for the purposes of Code chapter 8A, 13 subchapter IV, or Code chapter 20 or 669. 14 -4- LSB 2157YH (2) 91 as/js 4/ 4